src/fst/stems/verb_prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Choctaw language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON N-Intrans ! negative intransitives
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1SG@ak                               Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chik%>     Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1PL@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1PL@%k{il%}%>  Vb ; ! I-prefixes
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachik%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@ik                              Vb ;

  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1SG@iksa%>       Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2SG@ikchi%>      Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@ikpi%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@ikhapi%> Vb ; ! II-prefixes
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2PL@ikhachi%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@ik                                Vb ;

  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1SG@ik%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2SG@ikchi%{mN%}%>      Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@ikpi{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@ikhapi%{mN%}%> Vb ; ! III-prefixes
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2PL@ikhachi%{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@ikim%>           Vb ;
  

LEXICON V-Intrans
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1SG@                              Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2SG@ish%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1PL@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.1PL@%{il%}%> Vb ; ! I-prefixes
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hash%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.I@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@                             Vb ;

  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1SG@sa%>       Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chi%>      Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@pi%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@hapi%> Vb ; ! II-prefixes
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachi%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.II@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@                                Vb ;

  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1SG@%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chi%{mN%}%>      Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@pi{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@hapi%{mN%}%> Vb ; ! III-prefixes
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachi%{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@:@U.ARG.III@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@im%>           Vb ;

LEXICON V-I-for-I-II
  @U.SUBJ.1SG@                      V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.SUBJ.2SG@ish%>    V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.1PL@:@U.SUBJ.1PL@%{il%}%> V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.SUBJ.2PL@hash%>   V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@                     V-III-for-I-II ;

  @U.SUBJ.1SG@@P.N.T@ak                     V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.2SG@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.2SG@@P.N.T@chik%>    V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.1PL@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.1PL@@P.N.T@k%{il%}%> V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.2PL@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.2PL@@P.N.T@hachik%>  V-III-for-I-II ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@@P.N.T@ik                    V-III-for-I-II ;


LEXICON V-I-for-I-III
  @U.SUBJ.1SG@                      V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.2SG@:@U.SUBJ.2SG@ish%>     V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.1PL@:@U.SUBJ.1PL@%{il%}%>  V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.2PL@:@U.SUBJ.2PL@hash%>    V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@                     V-III-for-I-III ;

  @U.SUBJ.1SG@@P.N.T@ak                     V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.2SG@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.2SG@@P.N.T@chik%>    V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.1PL@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.1PL@@P.N.T@k%{il%}%> V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.2PL@@P.N.T@:@U.SUBJ.2PL@@P.N.T@hachik%>  V-III-for-I-III ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@@P.N.T@ik                    V-III-for-I-III ;
 

LEXICON V-III-for-I-II
  ! I-II verbs
  @D.SUBJ.1SG@@U.DAT.1SG@:@D.SUBJ.1SG@@U.DAT.1SG@%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   V-II-for-I-II ;
  @D.SUBJ.2SG@@U.DAT.2SG@:@D.SUBJ.2SG@@U.DAT.2SG@chi%{mN%}%>      V-II-for-I-II ;
  @D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@U.DAT.1PAUC@:@D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@U.DAT.1PAUC@pi{mN%}%>    V-II-for-I-II ;
  @D.SUBJ.1MULT@@U.DAT.1MULT@:@D.SUBJ.1MULT@@U.DAT.1MULT@hapi%{mN%}%> V-II-for-I-II ;
  @D.SUBJ.2PL@@U.DAT.2PL@:@D.SUBJ.2PL@@U.DAT.2PL@hachi%{mN%}%>    V-II-for-I-II ;
  @U.DAT.UNSP@:@U.DAT.UNSP@im%>           V-II-for-I-II ;
  @U.DAT.NONE@                           V-II-for-I-II ;

LEXICON V-III-for-I-III ! I think these verbs can't have a dative--not certain
  @D.SUBJ.1SG@@U.OBJ.1SG@:@D.SUBJ.1SG@@U.OBJ.1SG@%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.2SG@@U.OBJ.2SG@:@D.SUBJ.2SG@@U.OBJ.2SG@chi%{mN%}%>      Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@U.OBJ.1PAUC@:@D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@U.OBJ.1PAUC@pi{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.1MULT@@U.OBJ.1MULT@:@D.SUBJ.1MULT@@U.OBJ.1MULT@hapi%{mN%}%> Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.2PL@@U.OBJ.2PL@:@D.SUBJ.2PL@@U.OBJ.2PL@hachi%{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.OBJ.UNSP@:@U.OBJ.UNSP@im%>           Vb ;

LEXICON V-II-for-I-II
  @D.SUBJ.1SG@@D.DAT.1SG@@U.OBJ.1SG@:@D.SUBJ.1SG@@D.DAT.1SG@@U.OBJ.1SG@sa%>       Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.2SG@@D.DAT.2SG@@U.OBJ.2SG@:@D.SUBJ.2SG@@D.DAT.2SG@@U.OBJ.2SG@chi%>      Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@D.DAT.1PAUC@@U.OBJ.1PAUC@:@D.SUBJ.1PAUC@@D.DAT.1PAUC@@U.OBJ.1PAUC@pi%>   Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.1MULT@@D.DAT.1MULT@@U.OBJ.1MULT@:@D.SUBJ.1MULT@@D.DAT.1MULT@@U.OBJ.1MULT@hapi%> Vb ;
  @D.SUBJ.2PL@@D.DAT.2PL@@U.OBJ.2PL@:@D.SUBJ.2PL@@D.DAT.2PL@@U.OBJ.2PL@hachi%>    Vb ;
  @U.OBJ.UNSP@                     Vb ;
  
LEXICON V-II-for-II-II-obj
  ! II-II class
  @U.OBJ.1SG@:@U.OBJ.1SG@sa%>       V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
  @U.OBJ.2SG@:@U.OBJ.2SG@chi%>      V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
  @U.OBJ.1PAUC@:@U.OBJ.1PAUC@pi%>   V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
  @U.OBJ.1MULT@:@U.OBJ.1MULT@hapi%> V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
  @U.OBJ.2PL@:@U.OBJ.2PL@hachi%>    V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
  @U.OBJ.UNSP@                     V-II-for-II-II-subj ;
 
LEXICON V-II-for-II-II-subj
 ! II-II class subjects
  @D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@sa%>       Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chi%>      Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@pi%>   Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@hapi%> Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachi%>    Vb ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@                     Vb ;

  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@iksa%>       Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@ikchi%>      Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@ikpi%>   Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@ikhapi%> Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@ikhachi%>    Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@ik                     Vb ;

LEXICON V-II-for-III-II
  ! III-II class, they don't like to have non-3 obj here
  @U.OBJ.UNSP@ V-III-for-III-II ;

LEXICON V-II-for-II-III
  ! II-III class
  @D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@sa%>       Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chi%>      Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@pi%>   Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@hapi%> Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachi%>    Vb ;
  @U.SUBJ.2PL@        Vb ; 

LEXICON V-III-for-III-II
  ! III-II verbs
  @D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@chi%{mN%}%>      Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@pi{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@hapi%{mN%}%> Vb ;
  @D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@hachi%{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @U.SUBJ.UNSP@:@U.SUBJ.UNSP@im%>           Vb ;

  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1SG@@U.SUBJ.1SG@ik%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2SG@@U.SUBJ.2SG@ikchi%{mN%}%>      Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1PAUC@@U.SUBJ.1PAUC@ikpi{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.1MULT@@U.SUBJ.1MULT@ikhapi%{mN%}%> Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@:@P.N.T@@D.OBJ.2PL@@U.SUBJ.2PL@ikhachi%{mN%}%>    Vb ;
  @P.N.T@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@:@P.N.T@@U.SUBJ.UNSP@ikim%>           Vb ;

LEXICON V-III-for-II-III
  ! II-III verbs
  @U.OBJ.1SG@:@U.OBJ.1SG@%{s%}a%{mN%}%>   V-II-for-II-III ;
  @U.OBJ.2SG@:@U.OBJ.2SG@chi%{mN%}%>      V-II-for-II-III ;
  @U.OBJ.1PAUC@:@U.OBJ.1PAUC@pi{mN%}%>    V-II-for-II-III ;
  @U.OBJ.1MULT@:@U.OBJ.1MULT@hapi%{mN%}%> V-II-for-II-III ;
  @U.OBJ.2PL@:@U.OBJ.2PL@hachi%{mN%}%>    V-II-for-II-III ;
  @U.OBJ.UNSP@:@U.OBJ.UNSP@im%>           V-II-for-II-III ;

LEXICON Vb
0:+ V ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
